California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.9.

Each cemetery broker, other than a cemetery corporation holding a certificate of authority, and each cemetery salesperson shall include in any advertising a statement that he or she is acting as a cemetery broker or cemetery salesperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7637.10.

For violation of any of the provisions of Section 7637.9, the bureau may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of the cemetery licensee in accordance with the provisions of this act relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7638.

Any person, other than a person making an occasional sale, who advertises cemetery property for sale or exchange, without being duly licensed as a cemetery broker or a cemetery salesperson, or without possessing a certificate of authority as a cemetery corporation, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If such person is a corporation, it shall be punished by a fine of not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 18.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Hydrolysis Facilities [7639. - 7639.19.]

7639.

A corporation, partnership, or natural person may operate, establish, or maintain a hydrolysis facility with a valid hydrolysis facility license issued by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.02.

A change in the ownership of a hydrolysis facility shall be reported to the bureau. A transfer in a single transaction or related transactions of more than 50 percent of the equitable interest in a licensed hydrolysis facility shall constitute a change of ownership. When a change in ownership in a licensed hydrolysis facility occurs, the existing hydrolysis facility license shall lapse and the new owner shall obtain a license from the bureau as otherwise provided in this act. The bureau shall not require an applicant under this section to obtain any new permit or license from any other governmental agency when the existing permit or license is valid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.04.

The application for a hydrolysis facility license shall be made in writing on the form prescribed by the bureau and filed at the principal office of the bureau. The application shall be accompanied by the fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.06.

(a) The bureau shall require an applicant for a hydrolysis facility license to prove compliance with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, ordinances, and orders, and shall not issue a hydrolysis facility license until the bureau is satisfied that the public interest, human health, and environmental quality will be served by the applicant.

(b) The applicant for a hydrolysis facility license shall present to the bureau any state or locally required permits for business operations, including, but not limited to, any permits required by the following, to the extent applicable:

(1) The local public health department.

(2) The city, county, special district, joint powers authority, or other public agency that provides wastewater treatment services where the licensed hydrolysis facility is to be located.

(3) The Department of Toxic Substances Control for the creation, collection, treatment, or transport of hazardous waste.

(4) Any other state or locally required permit.

(c) The applicant for a hydrolysis facility license shall prove to the bureau that it has the appropriate permits and contracts for the disposal of hydrolysate and which of the following models the facility will be using for the disposal:

(1) Discharge to the sewer collection system.

(2) Containment, collection, and transport
 to an appropriate treatment facility.

(d) When applying to renew a hydrolysis facility license, an applicant shall present to the bureau records of annual maintenance of the hydrolysis chamber.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.08.

(a) The bureau shall adopt, and may from time to time amend, rules and regulations prescribing standards for applicants for hydrolysis facility licenses. In reviewing an application for a hydrolysis facility license, the bureau may consider acts of the applicant, including acts of the incorporators, officers, directors, and stockholders of the applicant, which shall constitute grounds for the denial of a hydrolysis facility license pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Hydrolysis chamber manufacturers may apply to the State Department of Public Health for approval of a hydrolysis chamber upon finding that the hydrolysis chamber causes the destruction of pathogenic micro-organisms pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 118215
 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) In its approval, the State Department of Public Health shall specify the minimum parameters of pH, time, temperature, and pressure that shall be used by each hydrolysis chamber to destroy all pathogenic micro-organisms. The department may use the guidance of the hydrolysis chamber operations and maintenance manual and biologic indicator spore testing to determine this, among other factors.

(d) The hydrolysis chamber manufacturer shall pay to the State Department of Public Health, the application and evaluation fee as outlined in Section 118245 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Every five years, licensed hydrolysis facilities that discharge hydrolysate to a sewer collection system shall submit to the Department of Public Health the results of biological indicator spore testing as
 well as the last 30 days of archived electronic hydrolysis chamber data that includes the pH, time, temperature, and pressure at which the chamber was operated. Based upon this information, the department shall evaluate whether the chamber continues to destroy pathogens. The licensee shall include this evaluation in its application to renew its license. If the chamber is determined not to destroy pathogens, the bureau shall not renew its license until this has been remedied. The department may charge a fee sufficient to cover the actual hourly costs of staff conducting its five year review of the alternative technology.

(f) Once a hydrolysis chamber has been approved pursuant to subdivision (b), it may be employed by a licensed hydrolysis facility for the final disposition of human remains.

(g) The bureau shall grant hydrolysis facility licenses only to applicants that will employ
 a hydrolysis chamber approved by the State Department of Public Health pursuant to subdivision (b).

(h) A hydrolysis facility shall ensure or conduct annual maintenance of the hydrolysis chamber.

(i) The bureau shall not renew a hydrolysis facility license without proof of annual maintenance of the hydrolysis chamber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 10.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.10.

(a) A licensed hydrolysis facility shall not conduct hydrolysis unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The licensee has a written contract with the person or persons entitled to custody of the remains clearly stating the location, manner, and time of disposition of the remains, in which the person or persons entitled to custody of the remains agree to pay the licensee’s regular fee for hydrolysis, disposition, and other services rendered, and any other contractual provisions required by the bureau.

(2) Hydrolysis of remains occurs not more than 24 hours after delivery of the remains to the licensee unless the remains have been preserved in the interim by
 refrigeration or embalming.

(3) The licensee has a contractual relationship with a licensed cemetery authority for final disposition of hydrolyzed human remains by burial, entombment, or inurnment of any and all remains that are not lawfully disposed of or that are not called for or accepted by the person or persons entitled to the custody and control of the disposition of those remains within 90 days of date of death.

(4) The licensee contains and collects all hydrolysate. Hydrolysate shall not be disposed of using a sewer collection system, except as prescribed in paragraph (8).

(5) The licensee ensures that any hydrolysate is transported by a state-licensed biomaterials handler to a publicly owned wastewater treatment plant or licensed industrial anaerobic digestion facility or waste-to-energy or biomass facility
 for the beneficial use or disposal of that hydrolysate, unless disposing of hydrolysate using a sewer collection system as prescribed in paragraph (8).

(6) Acceptance of hydrolysate from a licensed hydrolysis facility and a state-licensed biomaterials handler shall be voluntary and at the discretion of each individual facility described in paragraph (5).

(7) Acceptance of hydrolysate by a licensed industrial anaerobic digestion, waste-to-energy, or biomass facility, if the facility has an industrial process sewer connection to a sewer collection system, shall only be allowed with the consent of the publicly owned treatment works to which the sewer collection system is tributary.

(8) A licensed hydrolysis facility may dispose of hydrolysate using a sewer collection system only if all of the following conditions are
 met:

(A) The city, county, special district, joint powers authority, or other public agency that provides wastewater treatment and disposal services to the licensed hydrolysis facility expressly authorizes the disposal of hydrolysate into the sewer collection system. If issuance of a permit is required by another city, county, special district, joint powers authority, or other public agency that provides sewer collection services where the licensee is located, authorization from both agencies must be obtained.

(B) If the licensee receives the appropriate permissions required by subparagraph (A), the licensee shall comply with all local ordinances, pretreatment requirements, permitting requirements, waste discharge requirements, and all other applicable federal, state, and local laws, ordinances, and regulations governing the protection of water quality and public health, promotion
 of water recycling, and discharge into the sewer system.

(C) The licensee shall demonstrate compliance as deemed appropriate by the public agency or agencies authorizing the disposal of hydrolysate into the sewer collection system. At a minimum this should include annual water quality testing as prescribed by the public agency or agencies authorizing the disposal of hydrolysate into the sewer collection system.

(D) Authorization for disposal of hydrolysate using a sewer collection system shall be voluntary and at the discretion of each public agency described in subparagraph (A). Each public agency described in subparagraph (A) has the discretion to authorize or to prohibit the discharge of hydrolysate into a sewer collection system for any reason, including for purposes of promoting advanced water recycling systems.

(b) Existing alkaline hydrolysis facilities utilized by medical schools for the purpose of anatomical gifting shall not be subject to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and shall continue to be regulated under the guidelines of the state’s anatomical gifting regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.12.

A licensed hydrolysis facility shall not prohibit relatives or the responsible party from viewing the hydrolysis process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.16.

It is a misdemeanor for any person, firm, or corporation to hydrolyze human remains, or to engage in the disposition of hydrolyzed human remains, without a valid, unexpired hydrolysis facility license. Each hydrolysis carried out in violation of this section is a separate violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.18.

A licensed hydrolysis facility shall be subject to, and shall be disciplined by the bureau in accordance with, Article 6 (commencing with Section 7686).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 7639.19.)
-------------------------------------------

7639.19.

This article shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 846, Sec. 4.   (AB 967)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 2.7, commencing with Section 7639.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Embalmers [7640. - 7650.]

7640.

An embalmer is one who is duly qualified to disinfect or preserve human remains by the injection or external application of antiseptics, disinfectants or preservative fluids; to prepare human bodies for transportation which are dead of contagious or infectious diseases; and to use derma surgery or plastic art for restoring mutilated features; and who is duly licensed as an embalmer under the laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7641.

It is unlawful for any person to embalm a body, or engage in, or hold himself or herself out as engaged in practice as an embalmer, unless he or she is licensed by the bureau. However, this section shall have no effect on students and instructors of embalming in mortuary science programs approved by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 85.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7642.

An application for an embalmer’s license shall be written on a form provided by the bureau, verified by the applicant, and accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7643.

In order to qualify for a license as an embalmer, the applicant shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Be over 18 years of age.

(b) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(c) Have completed at least two years of apprenticeship under an embalmer licensed and engaged in practice as an embalmer in this state in a funeral establishment which shall have been approved for apprentices by the bureau and while so apprenticed shall have assisted in embalming not fewer than 100 human remains; provided, however, that a person who has been licensed and has
 practiced as an embalmer for a minimum of three years within the seven years preceding his or her application in any other state or country and whose license has never been suspended or revoked for unethical conduct shall not be required to serve any apprenticeship in this state.

(d) Have graduated from a mortuary science program approved by the bureau and accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education, or its equivalent, as determined by the bureau, and furnished official transcripts from that program or equivalent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 86.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7646.

(a) The bureau shall require the applicant to pass both of the following:

(1) The sciences section of the national examination administered by the International Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards, or its equivalent, as determined by the bureau.

(2) An examination, administered by the bureau, on the state’s laws and the rules and regulations of the bureau, including those sections of the Health and Safety Code which pertain to the funeral industry.

(b) An applicant who has previously passed the sciences section of the national examination
 described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be in compliance with that
 paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 375, Sec. 5.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7647.

Examinations shall be administered at times and places determined by the bureau and the International Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards.

The bureau shall give notice of the time and place of the examination described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7646.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 88.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7647.5.

Where a hearing is held to determine whether an application for a license should be granted, the proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the bureau shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7648.

No embalmer’s license is assignable, and only the licensee may engage in the practice of embalming under the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

7649.

Except as provided in Section 102805 of the Health and Safety Code, whenever the name of any licensed embalmer is subscribed to any certificate, the purport of which is that he or she has performed any act mentioned in the certificate, the licensed embalmer shall actually sign his or her name thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 874, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7650.

The bureau may examine the requirements for the issuance of licenses to embalmers in other states of the United States and cause a record to be kept of those states in which standards are maintained for embalmers, not lower than those provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 375, Sec. 6.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Licenses and Certificates of Authority [7651. - 7653.9.]

7651.

Application for license as a cemetery broker shall be made in writing on the form prescribed by the bureau and filed at the principal office of the bureau. The application shall be accompanied by the original cemetery broker’s license fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.1.

The bureau shall not grant an original cemetery broker’s license to any person who is not a resident of this state. Change of residence to another state shall terminate the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.2.

The bureau shall not grant an original cemetery broker’s license to any person who has not held a cemetery salesperson’s license for at least two years prior to the date of his or her application for the broker’s license, and during that time was not actively engaged in the business of a cemetery salesperson except that if an applicant for a cemetery broker’s license having at least the equivalent of two years’ general cemetery experience files a written petition with the bureau setting forth his or her qualifications and experience and the bureau approves, he or she may be issued a cemetery broker’s license immediately upon passing the appropriate examinations and satisfying the other requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.3.

Application for license as a cemetery salesperson shall be made in writing on the form prescribed by the bureau and filed at the principal office of the bureau. The application shall be signed by the applicant, and shall be accompanied by the cemetery salesperson’s license fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Section 7651.7 does not apply to an applicant for a cemetery salesperson’s license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.5.

The bureau shall investigate the qualifications of the applicants. Except as otherwise prescribed in this article, it may issue the license applied for to an applicant on a showing satisfactory to it that the following facts exist:

(a) The applicant is properly qualified to perform the duties of a cemetery broker or salesperson.

(b) Granting the license will not be against public interest.

(c) The applicant intends actively and in good faith to carry on the business of a cemetery broker or a cemetery salesperson.

(d) In the case of a corporate applicant, the articles of incorporation permit it to act as a cemetery broker.

(e) In the case of an association or copartnership applying for such a license, its articles of association or agreement of partnership authorize it to act as a cemetery broker.

(f) The license is not being secured for the purpose of permitting the applicant to advertise as a cemetery broker or salesperson without
 actually engaging in such business.

(g) The applicant has not committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.6.

All cemetery brokers who do not possess a certificate of authority shall, in addition to the requirements of this chapter, file with the bureau a satisfactory bond to the people of the State of California, duly executed by a sufficient surety or sureties to be approved by the bureau, in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000). That bond shall be conditioned for the honest and faithful performance by such broker and his or her salespersons and employees of any undertaking as a licensed cemetery broker or salesperson or employee of said broker at any time when licensed under this chapter, and the strict compliance with the provisions of this chapter and of Division 8 (commencing with Section 8100) of the Health and Safety Code, relating to
 cemeteries, and the honest and faithful application of all funds received. That
 bond shall be further conditioned upon the payment of all damages suffered by any person damaged or defrauded by reason of the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of Division 8 (commencing with Section 8100) of the Health and Safety Code relating to cemeteries, or by reason of the violation of the obligation of such broker as an agent, as such obligations are laid down by the Civil Code, or by reason of any fraud connected with or growing out of any transactions contemplated by this chapter or Division 8 (commencing with Section 8100) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.7.

The bureau shall ascertain by written examination that the applicant, and, in case of a copartnership or corporation applicant for a cemetery broker’s license, that each officer, agent, or member thereof through whom it proposes to act as a cemetery licensee has:

(a) Appropriate knowledge of the English language, including reading, writing, and spelling, and of elementary arithmetic.

(b) A fair understanding of:

(1) Cemetery associations, cemetery corporations, and duties of directors.

(2) Plot ownership, deeds, certificates of ownership, contracts of sale, liens, and leases.

(3) Establishing, dedicating, maintaining, managing, operating, improving, and conducting a cemetery.

(4) The care, preservation, and embellishment of cemetery property.

(5) The care and
 preservation of endowment care funds, trust funds, and the investment thereof.

(c) A general and fair understanding of the obligations between principal and agent, of the principles of cemetery brokerage practice and the business ethics pertaining thereto, as well as of the provisions of this act relating to cemetery brokerage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.8.

The bureau may, in its discretion, waive the examination of any applicant for a cemetery broker’s license who held an unrevoked or unsuspended cemetery license on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year as an individual broker, an officer of a corporation, or member of a copartnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.9.

An application on the form prescribed by the bureau for the renewal of any unrevoked and unsuspended license filed before midnight of June 30 of the year for which such unrevoked and unsuspended license was issued, accompanied by the applicable renewal fee, entitles the applicant to continue operating under his or her existing license after its usual expiration date, if not previously suspended or revoked, and until such date as he or she is notified in writing that the application has been granted or denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7651.10.

A cemetery license does not give authority to do any act specified in this act to any person other than the person to whom the license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.

When a cemetery brokerage license is issued to a cemetery brokerage corporation, if it desires any of its officers other than the officer through whom it is already licensed to act under its license as a cemetery broker, it shall procure an additional license for each such officer. When a cemetery brokerage license is granted to cemetery brokerage copartnership, if it desires any of its members other than the one through whom it is already licensed to act as a cemetery broker, it shall procure an additional license for each such member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.1.

Each officer of a corporation through whom it is licensed to act as a cemetery broker, and each member of a copartnership through whom it is licensed to act as a cemetery broker, is, while so employed under such license, a licensed cemetery broker, but licensed only to act as such for and on behalf of the corporation or the copartnership, as officer or member, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.2.

The cemetery licenses of both broker and salesperson shall be prominently displayed in the office of the broker.

The cemetery salesperson’s license shall remain in the possession of the licensed cemetery broker employer until canceled or until the salesperson leaves the employ of the broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.3.

Immediately upon the salesperson’s withdrawal from the employ of the broker, the broker shall return the salesperson’s license to the bureau for cancellation. A license canceled but not suspended or revoked may be reinstated within the fiscal year upon receipt of application therefor and the fee for the reinstatement of the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.4.

(a) Every licensed cemetery broker shall have and maintain a definite place of business in this state which shall serve as his or her office for the transaction of business.

(b) No cemetery license authorizes the licensee to do business except from the location for which the cemetery license was issued.

(c) Notice in writing shall be given the bureau of change of business location of a cemetery broker, whereupon the bureau shall issue a new cemetery license for the unexpired period. The change or
 abandonment of business location without notification to the bureau shall automatically cancel the license theretofore issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.5.

(a) If the applicant for a cemetery broker’s license maintains more than one place of business within the state, he or she shall apply for and procure an additional license for each branch office so maintained. Every such application shall state the name of the person and the location of the place of business for which such license is desired.

(b) The bureau may determine whether or not a broker is doing a cemetery brokerage business at or from any particular location which requires him or her to have a branch office license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.6.

Each cemetery broker shall erect and maintain a sign in a conspicuous place on the premises to indicate that he or she is a licensed cemetery broker and his or her name shall be clearly shown thereon. The size and place of the sign shall conform to regulations that may be adopted by the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.7.

For a violation of any of the provisions of Sections 7652.2, 7652.3, 7652.4, and 7652.6, the bureau may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of the cemetery licensee in accordance with the provisions of this act relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.8.

Application for a certificate of authority shall be made in writing on the form prescribed by the bureau and filed at the principal office of the bureau. The application shall be accompanied by the fee provided for in this act and shall show that the cemetery authority owns or is actively operating a cemetery in this state which is subject to the provisions of the act or that the applicant is in a position to commence operating a cemetery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.9.

Each cemetery for which a certificate of authority is required shall be operated under the supervision of a manager who is qualified in accordance with the regulations adopted by the bureau. Each cemetery manager shall be required to successfully pass a written examination evidencing an understanding of the applicable provisions of this code and of the Health and Safety Code. A person shall not engage in the business of, act in the capacity of, or advertise or assume to act as, a cemetery manager without first obtaining a license from the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7652.10.

The bureau may require such proof as it deems advisable concerning the compliance by such applicant to all the laws, rules, regulations, ordinances and orders applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.

(a) The bureau shall adopt, and may from time to time amend, rules and regulations prescribing standards of knowledge and experience and financial responsibility for applicants for certificates of authority. In reviewing an application for a certificate of authority, the bureau may consider acts of incorporators, officers, directors, and stockholders of the applicant, which shall constitute grounds for the denial of a certificate of authority under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(b) Upon receipt of an application for a certificate of authority, the bureau may cause an investigation to be made of the physical status, plans, specifications, and financing of the proposed cemetery, and any other qualifications required of the applicant under this act, and
 for this purpose may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and take testimony.

(c) At the time of the filing of the application required by this section, the applicant shall pay to the Cemetery and Funeral Fund the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) to defray the expenses of investigation. In the event the sum shall be insufficient to defray all of the expenses, the applicant shall, within five days after request, deposit an additional sum sufficient to defray those expenses, provided that the total sum shall not exceed nine hundred dollars ($900).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 44.   (SB 1443)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.1.

(a) The bureau may, in accordance with its rules and regulations, authorize interments in cemeteries for which there is no currently valid certificate of authority outstanding if the bureau finds that rights to interment therein will otherwise be impaired. However, nothing in this section authorizes sales of lots, vaults, or niches by cemeteries for which there is no currently valid certificate of authority. Interments permitted under this section shall be conducted by persons authorized by the bureau in accordance with its regulations, and Section 7731.2 shall not be applicable to such interments.

(b) The bureau or its representative shall be entitled to inspect and
 copy any cemetery records necessary to the performance of interments under this section, and any person having custody of those records shall permit inspection and copying thereof for that purpose. The bureau may apply to the superior court for the county in which the cemetery is located for an order temporarily transferring custody of cemetery records to it for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.2.

The bureau shall inspect the books, records, and premises of any crematory licensed under this chapter. In making those inspections, the bureau shall have access to all books and records, the crematory building, the cremation chambers or furnaces, and the storage areas for human remains before and after cremation, during regular office hours or the hours the crematory is in operation. No prior notification of the inspection is required to be given to the crematory licensee. If any crematory licensee fails to allow that inspection or any part thereof, it shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license or other disciplinary action against the licensee. All proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the
 provisions of this chapter relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.3.

The bureau shall annually conduct a minimum of one unannounced inspection of each licensed crematory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 395, Sec. 19.   (AB 180)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.35.

(a) The bureau shall inspect the books, records, and premises of a hydrolysis facility licensed under this chapter. In making those inspections, the bureau shall have access to all books and records, the hydrolysis facility, the hydrolysis chamber, and the storage areas for human remains before and after hydrolysis, during regular office hours or the hours the hydrolysis facility is in operation. Prior notification of the inspection is not required to be given to the hydrolysis facility licensee. If a hydrolysis facility licensee fails to allow that inspection or any part thereof, it shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license or other disciplinary action against the licensee. All proceedings under this section shall be
 conducted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 5.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.35.

(a) The bureau shall inspect the books, records, and premises of a reduction facility or a hydrolysis facility licensed under this chapter. In making those inspections, the bureau shall have access to all books and records, the hydrolysis or reduction facility, the hydrolysis chamber or reduction chamber, and the storage areas for human remains before and after reduction or hydrolysis, during regular office hours or the hours the facility is in operation. Prior notification of the inspection is not required to be given to the licensee. If a licensee fails to allow inspection or any part thereof, it shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license or other disciplinary action against the licensee. All
 proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter relating to disciplinary proceedings.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 399, Sec. 6.   (AB 351)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7653.36.

(a) The bureau shall annually conduct a minimum of one unannounced inspection of each licensed hydrolysis facility.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.
